test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-riebe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - riebe: # N_ODD_WG_eH 'red fox'
    riebe+N+Sg+Nom: riebe
    riebe+N+Sg+Gen: rehpiha
    riebe+N+Sg+Acc: rehpihav
    riebe+N+Sg+Ill: rehpihij
    riebe+N+Sg+Ine: rehpihin
    riebe+N+Sg+Ela: [rehpihist, rehpihis]
    riebe+N+Sg+Com: rehpihijn
    riebe+N+Pl+Nom: rehpiha
    riebe+N+Pl+Gen: rehpihij
    riebe+N+Pl+Acc: rehpihijd
    riebe+N+Pl+Ill: rehpihijda
    riebe+N+Pl+Ine: rehpihijn
    riebe+N+Pl+Ela: [rehpihijst, rehpihijs]
    riebe+N+Pl+Com: [rehpihij, rehpihijgum]
#    riebe+N+Ess: rehpihin !??
#    riebe+N+Abe: rehpihak !??
